California statutes. Corporations Code
======================================================================

TITLE 10. REPEALS [100000. - 100008.]

100000.

The following acts and sections are repealed:GENERAL LAWSYear: Ch: PageYear: Ch: PageYear: Ch: PageSecs. 1-32, incl.
 and1858:298:2641865- 6:478:620 175-184, incl. of1859: 98: 931867- 8:208:2011850:128:3471862: 23: 171867- 8:255:2681852:100:1721863: 94:1011867- 8:288:3101853: 65: 871863:140:1731867- 8:326:3721853:175:2741863:248:3241867- 8:534:7081854: 22:148 (Spec.)1863:303:4021869-70: 35: 401855: 1: 11863-4:120:1091869-70:116:1071857: 80: 751863-4:294:3021869-70:165:2291857:110:1211863-4:295:3031869-70:553:8221857:189:2081865-6: 54: 371869-70:578:8811858: 68: 571865-6:118:1001871- 2: 44: 451858: 99: 801865-6:270:3041871- 2:225:3001858:181:1331865-6:376:4581871- 2:318:432Corporations formed and existing before 12 o’clock, noon, of January 1, 1873, which have not elected to continue their existence under the provisions of the Civil Code repealed by this code or under this code are not affected by the repeal of any act or section by this section. The acts and sections repealed by this section continue to apply to all such corporations, notwithstanding their repeal by this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

100001.

The following acts and sections are repealed:GENERAL LAWSYear:Ch:PageYear:Ch:PageYear: Ch: Page1871-2:566:8261877-8:450:6951915:190: 4221873-4:216:3201877-8:561:8831931:862:1762Secs. 1, 2, 3, 5, 14 of
1873-4:340: 4991895:183 :2211931:866:18381901: 93 :1081931:871:18471875-6:456:6531913:336 :6801935:289:1006CIVIL CODESectionsSectionsSections277317330.10278318330.11279319330.12280320330.13281320a330.15285320b330.16287320c330.17288320d330.18290321330.19291321a330.20292321b330.21293322330.22294322a330.23295323332296324333297325334297a325a334a298326335299326a336300a326b337300b327338301328339302328a340303328b341304328c342305328d342a306328e342b307328f343307a329343b307b330344308330.1345309330.2346310330.3346a311330.4346b312330.5346c313330.6347314330.7348315330.8348a316330.9348b348c402601352402a602353403603354403a604355403b605356403c605a357403d605b358404605c359404a605d361404b605dd361a404c605e361b405605g362405a605h362a406605i362b406a605j362c406b605k362d407605l363408605m364409605n365411606366412607367413607a368591607b369592607c370592a653.1370a592b653.2371592c653.3372592d653.5373592e653.6374593653.7375593a653.8399594653.9399a594.5653.10400595653.11400a596653.12401597653.13401a598653.14401c599653.15600653.16PENAL CODESectionsSectionsSections557559563558560564POLITICAL CODESectionsSectionsSections3666c3669cc3669d3669c

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

100002.

The following acts and code sections are repealed:GENERAL LAWSYearCh:Page1869-70129123CIVIL CODESectionsSectionsSections2395242024812396242124822397242224832398242324842399242424852400242524862401242624872402242724882403242824892404242924902405243024912406243124922407243224932408243324942409243424952410243524962411243624972412243724982413243824992414243925002415247225012416247725022417247825032418247925042419248025052506PENAL
 CODESection358

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 383.)
-------------------------------------------

100003.

The following acts and code sections are repealed:GENERAL LAWSYear: Ch: Page1911 :572 :10931933 :409 :10371933 :869 :22491945 :144 : 630CIVIL CODESectionsSections252325252524PENAL CODESectionsSections559564563568

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

100004.

Chapter 183 of the Statutes of 1941 is repealed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

100005.

The Corporate Securities Act (Chapter 532 of the Statutes of 1917) is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 384.)
-------------------------------------------

100006.

Chapter 784 of the Statutes of 1937 is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

100007.

Chapter 1035 of the Statutes of 1945 is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 462.)
-------------------------------------------

100008.

Chapter 226 of the Statutes of 1923 is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

